Hawaii statutes.
§171-57 Reserved rights and easements.
Notwithstanding any limitations to the contrary, where public land is disposed
of with reservation in the State of quarry rights to rock, sand or gravel or an
easement, and if the board of land and natural resources finds that a
disposition of the reserved right or easement is not prejudicial to the best
interest of the State, community or area in which the land is situated, it may,
after giving public notice of the intended disposition as provided in section
171-16(d), dispose of the reserved right or easement to the owner of the land
by direct sale or by lease without public auction. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am
L 1965, c 239, §5; Supp, §103A-54; am L 1967, c 234, §3; HRS §171-57; am L
1971, c 18, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next